apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="jyne__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gie__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="de/i__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iin</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iin</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iin</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/it__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>its</l>       <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otten</l>     <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ittin</l>      <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ittin</l>      <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ittin</l>      <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fr/eeze__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eeze</l>      <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeze</l>      <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eezes</l>     <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uize</l>      <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozen</l>      <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eezin</l>     <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eezin</l>     <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eezin</l>     <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="scowf__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="com/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ome</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="c/ome__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ome</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ome</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omes</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cour/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="craw__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dei">             <i>de</i><par n="de/i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forgit">          <i>forg</i><par n="g/it__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="git">             <i>g</i><par n="g/it__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="freeze">          <i>fr</i><par n="fr/eeze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="come">              <i>come</i><par n="com/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="come">              <i>c</i><par n="c/ome__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="courie">            <i>cour</i><par n="cour/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="craw">              <i>craw</i><par n="craw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="git">               <i>g</i><par n="g/it__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beal">             <i>beal</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="borrae">           <i>borrae</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="breenge">          <i>breenge</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="collogue">         <i>collogue</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compone">          <i>compone</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comprise">         <i>comprise</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conduct">          <i>conduct</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="creeticeese">      <i>creeticeese</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="crie">      <i>crie</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crown">            <i>croun</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dae">              <i>dae</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="daunder">          <i>daunder</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="develop">          <i>develop</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dink">             <i>differ</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dou">              <i>dout</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dree">             <i>dree</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="droun">            <i>droun</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ettle">            <i>ettle</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fear">             <i>fear</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feast">            <i>feast</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flether">          <i>flether</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="follae">           <i>follae</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forder">           <i>forder</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frichten">         <i>frichten</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gree">             <i>gree</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="growe">            <i>growe</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grund">            <i>grund</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="haiver">           <i>haiver</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="happen">           <i>happen</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hiddle">           <i>hiddle</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hing">             <i>hing</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kittle">           <i>kittle</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lauch">            <i>lauch</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="laund">            <i>laund</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="learn">     <i>learn</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lippen">           <i>lippen</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="love">             <i>love</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lowse">            <i>lowse</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="malkie">           <i>malkie</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marrae">           <i>marrae</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mate">             <i>mate</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mooth">            <i>mooth</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="muck">             <i>muck</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pass">             <i>pass</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reid">             <i>reid</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sain">             <i>sain</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sell">             <i>sell</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shairp">           <i>shairp</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slicht">           <i>slicht</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stap">             <i>stap</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="teeter">           <i>teeter</i><par n="scowf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tent">             <i>tent</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traivel">          <i>traivel</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="try">              <i>try</i><par n="gie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="waash">            <i>waash</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wauken">           <i>wauken</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wint">             <i>wint</i><par n="jyne__vblex"/></e>
